Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-557
License, registration, or nonresident's operating privilege; operating motor vehicle while suspended or revoked; effect.

Any person whose license, registration, or nonresident's operating privilege has been suspended or revoked under the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act and who, during such suspension or revocation, drives any motor vehicle upon any highway or knowingly permits any motor vehicle owned by such person to be operated by another upon any highway, except as permitted under the act, shall be subject to section 60-4,108.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 57, p. 502;

Laws 1959, c. 293, § 6, p. 1100;

Laws 1989, LB 25, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 131;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 41.

This section sets forth the penalty for violation of Safety Responsibility Act. State v. Ruggiere, 180 Neb. 869, 146 N.W.2d 373 (1966).